Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 2 Department of Labor
11-2-204. Records and information confidential.

All files, reports, letters, memoranda, minutes, documents, or other papers in the official custody of the Arkansas Mediation and Conciliation Service or any of its employees, or any other information, whether written or not, obtained in the course of any employee's official duties, relating to or acquired in its or their official activities under the labor laws of the state or the rules lawfully promulgated by the Director of the Division of Labor, are confidential.

No confidential records or information shall be disclosed to any unauthorized person or be taken or withdrawn, copied, or removed from the custody of the service or its employees or former employees by any person or by any agent or representative of the person without the prior written consent of the representatives of both parties to the dispute involved.

All information and material prepared or received by officers or employees shall be held in strictest confidence.

Papers, reports, and copies thereof pertaining to or a part of dispute case files are not personal property but are the property of the state.

Officers or employees terminating their connection with the service shall not be allowed to either keep or obtain copies of dispute case material or other official papers. Furthermore, all information, whether written or not, obtained in the course of their official duties must, after termination of their connection with the service, be treated by former employees with the same confidentiality as if they were still connected with the service.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 750, §§ 4, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-128, 81-131; 2019, No. 315, § 754; 2019, No. 910, § 5302.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-2-205. Compliance with subpoenas.

No officer, employee, former employee, or other person officially connected or formerly officially connected to the Arkansas Mediation and Conciliation Service shall produce or present any confidential records of the service or testify in behalf of any party to any cause pending in any arbitration or other proceedings or court or before any board, commission, committee, tribunal, investigatory body, or administrative agency of the United States or of any state, territory, the District of Columbia, or the state or any municipality or political subdivision thereof with respect to facts or other matters coming to his or her knowledge in his or her official capacity, whether in answer to an order, subpoena duces tecum, or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the representatives of both parties to the dispute.

Whenever any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum calling for confidential records or testimony as described in subsection (a) of this section has been served upon any officer, employee, or other person, he or she will appear in answer thereto and, unless otherwise expressly agreed to by the representatives of both parties to the dispute, respectfully decline, by reason of this section, to produce or present the confidential records or to give testimony.

Immediately upon receipt of the subpoena, the mediator or former mediator or employee should contact the Director of the Division of Labor, who shall immediately notify the staff attorneys of the Department of Labor and Licensing of the state to ensure that the procedures set forth in this subchapter will be followed. The director then shall instruct the staff attorneys to appear in behalf of the mediator and protect the service from any disclosure that violates the provisions contained in this subchapter.

In the event that the court insists that the mediator testify or produce documents, the staff attorneys of the department shall be further instructed to take immediate steps to procure the release of the mediator pending an appeal from the court's decision.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 750, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-129; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5303.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in the first sentence of (b)(2), substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”, and substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Department of Labor”.

11-2-206. Judicial review.

The mediator or the Director of the Division of Labor on his or her behalf or the Attorney General on his or her behalf may obtain a review of the order requiring him or her to testify.

The review may be obtained by filing in the Supreme Court, within thirty (30) days following the issuance of the order, a written petition praying that the order be modified or set aside.

A copy of the petition shall be forthwith transmitted by the Clerk of the Supreme Court to the clerk of the court issuing the order to testify or to produce documents and to the other parties, and thereupon that clerk shall file in the Supreme Court the record in the proceedings.

Upon filing, the Supreme Court shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding and of the question determined therein.

The Supreme Court shall have power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper and to make and enter upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in the record a decree affirming, modifying, or setting aside, in whole or in part, the order of the court issuing its order to the mediator to testify or to produce and enforcing the order to the extent that it is affirmed or modified.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 750, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-130; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5304.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(1).